Wisconsin, session 2025, AB329.
do enact as follows:AB329,11Section 1. 23.33 (1) (dr) of the statutes is created to read:AB329,3,4223.33 (1) (dr) “Bridge” means any structure constructed in or over a navigable 3waterway to provide a walkway or roadway for pedestrians, animals, or vehicles. 4“Bridge” includes pipe arches and culverts.AB329,25Section 2. 23.33 (1) (fb) of the statutes is created to read:AB329,4,2123.33 (1) (fb) “Culvert” means a structure that allows water to flow under a 2road, trail, or other obstruction. AB329,33Section 3. 23.33 (1) (fc) of the statutes is created to read:AB329,4,6423.33 (1) (fc) “Dune buggy” means a motor driven device originally 5manufactured with, or modified to have, an open-frame construction, seats in which 6occupants sit close to the ground, and off-road tires designed for travel in sand.AB329,47Section 4. 23.33 (1) (iq) of the statutes is created to read:AB329,4,10823.33 (1) (iq) “Navigable waterway” means any body of water with a defined 9bed and bank that is capable of floating the lightest boat or skiff used for recreation 10or any other purpose on a regularly recurring basis.AB329,511Section 5. 23.33 (1) (ja) of the statutes is renumbered 23.33 (1) (ji).AB329,612Section 6. 23.33 (1) (jb) of the statutes is created to read:AB329,4,201323.33 (1) (jb) “Patrol all-terrain vehicle” means an all-terrain vehicle that is 14owned or leased by a city, village, town, county, state agency, federal agency, 15federally recognized American Indian tribe, or public safety corporation, used for 16law enforcement, fire fighting, or emergency medical response, and equipped with a 17siren and one or more flashing, oscillating, or rotating red lights, or red and white 18lights or, if the all-terrain vehicle is operated by a law enforcement officer, a blue 19light or a blue and white light, and a red light or a red and white light, all of which 20are flashing, oscillating, or rotating.AB329,721Section 7. 23.33 (1) (jc) of the statutes is renumbered 23.33 (1) (jj).AB329,822Section 8. 23.33 (1) (jd) of the statutes is renumbered 23.33 (1) (jk).AB329,923Section 9. 23.33 (1) (je) of the statutes is renumbered 23.33 (1) (jL).AB329,1024Section 10. 23.33 (1) (jh) of the statutes is created to read:AB329,5,8123.33 (1) (jh) “Patrol utility terrain vehicle” means a utility terrain vehicle 2that is owned or leased by a city, village, town, county, state agency, federal agency, 3federally recognized American Indian tribe, or public safety corporation, used for 4law enforcement, fire fighting, or emergency medical response, and equipped with a 5siren and one or more flashing, oscillating, or rotating red lights, or red and white 6lights or, if the utility terrain vehicle is operated by a law enforcement officer, a blue 7light or a blue and white light, and a red light or a red and white light, all of which 8are flashing, oscillating, or rotating.AB329,119Section 11. 23.33 (1) (ng) 1. e. of the statutes is amended to read:AB329,5,101023.33 (1) (ng) 1. e. A Two tail light lights.AB329,1211Section 12. 23.33 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB329,5,131223.33 (3) (a) In any careless way, reckless, or negligent manner so as to 13endanger impair the life, person, or property of another.AB329,1314Section 13. 23.33 (4) (d) 3. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB329,5,231523.33 (4) (d) 3. a. To cross a bridge, culvert, or railroad right-of-way. The 16crossing of a bridge, culvert, or railroad right-of-way is not authorized if the 17roadway is officially closed to all-terrain vehicle or utility terrain vehicle traffic, 18except as provided in subd. 3. b. The crossing is authorized only if the crossing is 19done in the most direct manner practicable, if the crossing is made at a place where 20no obstruction prevents a quick and safe crossing, and if the operator stops the 21vehicle prior to the crossing entering the roadway and yields the right-of-way to 22other vehicles, pedestrians, electric scooters, and electric personal assistive 23mobility devices using the roadway.AB329,1424Section 14. 23.33 (4) (d) 3. b. of the statutes is amended to read:AB329,6,6123.33 (4) (d) 3. b. A person may operate an all-terrain vehicle or utility terrain 2vehicle on the roadway or shoulder of any highway to cross a bridge that is 1,000 feet 3in length or less, culvert, or railroad right-of-way if the operation is in compliance 4with a county ordinance adopted under sub. (11) (am) 3. that applies to that bridge, 5culvert, or railroad right-of-way and a city, village, or town ordinance adopted under 6sub. (11) (am) 3. that applies to that bridge, culvert, or railroad right-of-way.AB329,157Section 15. 23.33 (4) (d) 8. of the statutes is created to read:AB329,6,10823.33 (4) (d) 8. On any roadway if the operation is for emergency purposes 9during a period of emergency declared by the governmental agency having 10jurisdiction over the roadway.AB329,1611Section 16. 23.33 (6) (a) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB329,6,151223.33 (6) (a) No person may operate an all-terrain vehicle unless it is equipped 13with a headlamp and tail lamp and the required lamps are lighted. No person may 14operate a utility terrain vehicle unless it is equipped with 2 headlamps and 2 tail 15lamps and the required lamps are lighted.AB329,1716Section 17. 23.33 (6) (ar) of the statutes is created to read:AB329,6,191723.33 (6) (ar) Headlamps, brake lights, and tail lamps on an all-terrain 18vehicle and on a utility terrain vehicle shall be maintained in working condition at 19all times. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab329 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab329 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB329 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB329 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB329: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting